Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2892
Pharmacy technicians; responsibility for supervision and performance.

(1) The pharmacist in charge of a pharmacy, remote dispensing pharmacy, or hospital pharmacy employing pharmacy technicians shall be responsible for the supervision and performance of the pharmacy technicians.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in the Automated Medication Systems Act, the supervision of pharmacy technicians at a pharmacy shall be performed by the pharmacist who is on duty in the facility with the pharmacy technicians or located in pharmacies that utilize a real-time, online database and have a pharmacist in all pharmacies. The supervision of pharmacy technicians at a remote dispensing pharmacy or hospital pharmacy shall be performed by the pharmacist assigned by the pharmacist in charge to be responsible for the supervision and verification of the activities of the pharmacy technicians.

Laws 2007, LB236, § 33;

R.S.Supp.,2007, § 71-1,147.67;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 52;

Laws 2017, LB166, § 17;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 76.

Automated Medication Systems Act, see section 71-2444.